Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-128
Drainage improvements; payment of assessments in cash; effect.

Any owner of any tract of land, or of an easement therein, may pay the whole of his assessment in cash, and in such case the bonds so issued shall not be a lien against the lands, lots or property of the owner.

Laws 1909, c. 145, § 1, p. 505;

Laws 1911, c. 140, § 21, p. 461;

R.S.1913, § 1745;

C.S.1922, § 1692;

C.S.1929, § 31-128;

R.S.1943, § 31-128.